Hawaii statutes.
[§521-53] Access. (a) The tenant
shall not unreasonably withhold the tenant's consent to the landlord to enter
into the dwelling unit in order to inspect the premises; make necessary or
agreed repairs, decorations, alterations, or improvements; supply services as
agreed; or exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective purchasers, mortgagees, or
tenants.

(b) The landlord shall not abuse this right of
access nor use it to harass the tenant. Except in case of emergency or where
impracticable to do so, the landlord shall give the tenant at least two days
notice of the landlord's intent to enter and shall enter only during reasonable
hours.

(c) The landlord shall have no other right of
entry, except by court order, unless the tenant appears to have abandoned the
premises, or as permitted by section 521-70(b). [L 1972, c 132, pt of §1; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next